Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4163.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 203. (1) This section may be known as the "defend the guard act". (2) Notwithstanding any other provision of this act, the Michigan national guard and any member of the Michigan national guard must not be released from this state into active duty combat unless the United States Congress has passed an official declaration of war or has taken an official action under clause 15 of section 8 of article I of the Constitution of the United States to explicitly call forth the state militia to execute the laws of the union, suppress an insurrection, or repel an invasion. The governor shall take all actions necessary to comply with the requirements of this section. (3) As used in this section, "active duty combat" and "official declaration of war" mean those terms as defined in section 203a. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 4164 (request no. H01713'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.